Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8705
Identifiable information, defined.

Identifiable information means information that is presented in a form and manner that allows the identification of any provider, patient, or reporter of patient safety work product. With respect to patients, such information includes any individually identifiable health information as that term is defined in the regulations promulgated pursuant to section 264(c) of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, as such regulations existed on April 28, 2005.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 5.